Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB460.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1205.6(a)(3) and (4) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended and paragraph (1) is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 1205.6(A)(4) OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, IS AMENDED AND PARAGRAPH (1) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBPARAGRAPH TO READ:Section 1205.6. Child Abuse Recognition and Reporting <--<--12345678910111213141516171819 Training.--(a) School entities and independent contractors of school entities shall provide their employes who have direct contact with children with mandatory training on child abuse recognition and reporting. The following apply:(1) Training shall address, but shall not be limited to, the following topics:* * *(v) Child abuse awareness and prevention as described in section 1529.* * *(3) Employes shall complete a minimum of [three (3)] four (4) hours of training every five (5) years.(4) Employes required to undergo continuing professional education under section 1205.2 shall receive credit toward their continuing professional education requirements if the training program has been approved by the Department of Education in consultation with the Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1529. Child Abuse Awareness and Prevention.--(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each school entity shall develop an age-appropriate child abuse awareness and prevention education program and incorporate the program into the school entity's existing curriculum for students in kindergarten through grade twelve. In developing the program, the school entity shall use the model curriculum developed by the department under subsection (b)(1).(b) The department, in consultation with the Department of Human Services and at least one organization addressing child 20250HB0460PN2860 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 abuse, shall:(1) Develop a model child abuse awareness and prevention curriculum, which may include materials already publicly available, and make the curriculum available to all school entities and, upon request, to nonpublic schools.(2) Compile, develop and post on its publicly accessible Internet website recommended guidelines and educational materials regarding child abuse awareness and prevention, which may include materials already publicly available and which may be used for the purposes of the training specified under section 1205.6(a)(1)(v).SECTION 1529. CHILD ABUSE AWARENESS AND PREVENTION.--(A) BEGINNING WITH THE 2027-2028 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH SCHOOL ENTITY, NONPUBLIC SCHOOL AND PRIVATE ACADEMIC SCHOOL SHALL OFFER AN AGE-APPROPRIATE, EVIDENCE-BASED CHILD ABUSE AWARENESS AND PREVENTION EDUCATION PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE HEALTH STANDARDS PROMULGATED BY THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION. THE PROGRAM SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION REGARDING THE PREVENTION OF SEXUAL ABUSE OR EXPLOITATION. IN DEVELOPING THE PROGRAM, EACH SCHOOL ENTITY, NONPUBLIC SCHOOL AND PRIVATE ACADEMIC SCHOOL MAY USE THE GUIDELINES AND EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS COMPILED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (B).(B) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES AND AT LEAST ONE ORGANIZATION ADDRESSING CHILD ABUSE, SHALL COMPILE, DEVELOP AND POST ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE RECOMMENDED GUIDELINES AND EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS REGARDING CHILD ABUSE AWARENESS AND PREVENTION, INCLUDING THE PREVENTION OF SEXUAL ABUSE OR EXPLOITATION, WHICH MAY INCLUDE MATERIALS ALREADY PUBLICLY AVAILABLE AND WHICH MAY BE USED FOR THE PURPOSES OF THE TRAINING 20250HB0460PN2860 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SPECIFIED UNDER SECTION 1205.6(A)(1)(V).(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child abuse." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6303(b.1) (relating to definitions)."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Nonpublic school." A nonprofit school, other than a school entity, where a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and which meets the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000d et seq.)."PRIVATE ACADEMIC SCHOOL." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF JANUARY 28, 1988 (P.L.24, NO.11), KNOWN AS THE "PRIVATE ACADEMIC SCHOOLS ACT," WHICH IS LICENSED UNDER THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE "PRIVATE ACADEMIC SCHOOLS ACT.""School entity." A school district, joint school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school."SEXUAL ABUSE OR EXPLOITATION." AS DEFINED IN 23 PA.C.S. § 6303(A).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0460PN2860 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324